src/fst/affixes/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
LEXICON 0i-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@i2saà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@i2siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@i2siì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ii    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;


!
! ni-IPFV
!
LEXICON ni-IPFV
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@                   ni-IPFV-AFF ;

LEXICON ni-IPFV-AFF
@U.VV.%0@@D.PREFIX@                          ni-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                    ni-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                   ni-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                    ni-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.S@@D.PREFIX@                           nis-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     nis-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    nis-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     nis-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.I@@D.PREFIX@                           nii-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     nii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    nii-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     nii-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON ni-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ni    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;

LEXICON ni-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
! Three forms of 2SG ni-IPFV after an inner prefix are attested and freely
! interchangeable: ní-, níni-, and íni- (e.g., ch'àdinít'a ~ ch'àdinínit'a ~
! ch'àdiínit'a "you (sg.) are holy", after inner prefix di-; cf. TLQ-20210510).
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@níni  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@iíni  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;

LEXICON ni-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix
! Three forms of 2SG ni-IPFV -- ní-, níni-, and íni- -- are attested and freely
! interchangeable after certain middle prefixes (e.g., máguníshón ~
! mágunínishón ~ mágúunishón "you (sg.) know him/her/it", after middle prefix
! gu-; cf. TLQ-20210510), in exactly the same way as they appear after inner
! prefixes.
!
! However, these variants are not acceptable after direct object middle
! prefixes (e.g., nàsìnístà "you (sg.) will put me down / set me down", but
! not *nàsìnínistà or *nàsiínistà; cf. TLQ-20210616).  If any direct object
! marking is present, we proceed to a more restrictive continuation where
! only ní- is defined for 2SG inflection.  Otherwise, we can reuse the existing
! inner prefix TAMA chunk forms.
@R.OBJECTPERSON@                             ni-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-DObj;
@D.OBJECTPERSON@                             ni-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix;

LEXICON ni-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-DObj
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;

LEXICON ni-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;


LEXICON nis-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;

LEXICON nis-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
! Three forms of 2SG nis-IPFV after an inner prefix are attested and freely
! interchangeable: nís-, nínis-, and ínis- (e.g., diníssúl ~ dinínisúl ~
! diínisúl "you (sg.) are hairy")
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nínis #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@iínis #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;

LEXICON nis-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix
@R.OBJECTPERSON@                             nis-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-DObj;
@D.OBJECTPERSON@                             nis-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix;

LEXICON nis-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-DObj
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;

LEXICON nis-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;


LEXICON nii-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ii    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;

LEXICON nii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
! Three forms of 2SG nii-IPFV after an inner prefix are attested and freely
! interchangeable: níí-, niínii-, and iínii- (e.g., tłítsiníínì ~
! tłítsiniíniinì ~ tłítsiíniinì "you (sg.) are tasty, taste good")
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@níí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@niínii #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@iínii #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ii    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;

LEXICON nii-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix
@R.OBJECTPERSON@                             nii-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-DObj;
@D.OBJECTPERSON@                             nii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix;

LEXICON nii-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-DObj
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@níí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ii    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;

LEXICON nii-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@níí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ii    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;


!
! ni-PFV
!
LEXICON ni-PFV
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@                    ni-PFV-AFF ;

LEXICON ni-PFV-AFF
@U.VV.%0@@D.PREFIX@                          ni-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                    ni-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                   ni-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                    ni-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.S@@D.PREFIX@                           nis-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     nis-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    nis-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     nis-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.I@@D.PREFIX@                           nii-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     nii-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    nii-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     nii-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON ni-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìní   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìní   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
